Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.610

Official controls—Reference to board.

A copy of any official control or amendment recommended pursuant to RCW 36.70.550, 36.70.560, 36.70.570 and 36.70.580 shall be submitted to the board not later than fourteen days following the action by the commission and shall be accompanied by the motion of the planning agency approving the same, together with a statement setting forth the factors considered at the hearing, and analysis of findings considered by the commission to be controlling.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.610. Prior: 1961 c 232 s 4; 1959 c 201 s 61.]